en: griffonia, griffonia simplicifolia
hr: griffonia, griffonia simplicifolia
it: griffonia

en: mustard
af: mosterd
an: senabe
ar: صلصة الخردل
be: гарчыца
bg: горчица, синап
bn: সরিষার আচার
br: sezo
bs: senf
ca: mostassa
co: mustarda
cs: hořčice
da: sennep
de: Senf
el: μουστάρδα, σινάπι
eo: mustardo
es: mostaza
et: sinep
eu: mostaza
fa: خردل
fi: sinappi, sinappia
fo: sinoppur
fr: moutarde
fy: moster
ga: mustard, mustaird
gl: mostaza
he: חרדל
hi: सरसों
hr: gorušica, gorušice, senf, gorušicu
ht: moutad
hu: mustár
hy: մանանեխ
ia: mustarda
id: moster
io: mustardo
is: sinnep
it: senape
ja: マスタード, からし
jv: mustar
ka: მდოგვი
ko: 겨자 소스, 머스터드
ku: gormiz
la: sinapi
lb: Moschter
li: sinapi
lt: garstyčios, garstyčių
lv: sinepes
mg: voantsinapy
mi: panikakā
mk: сенф
ml: കടുക്
ms: mustard
mt: mustarda
nb: sennep
nl: mosterd
nn: sennep
or: ଶୋରିଷ ଆଚାର
pa: ਸਰੋਂ
pl: musztarda
pt: mostarda
qu: mustasa
ro: muștar, muştar, mustar
ru: горчица, горчицы
se: sennet
sh: senf
sk: horčica
sl: gorčica
sq: mustardë kuzhine
sr: сенф
sv: senap, senaps
ta: கடுகு
th: มัสตาร์ด
tr: hardal
tt: горчица
uk: гірчиця
vi: mù tạc
wa: moståde
zh: 芥末醬, 芥菜醬
zu: umasitadi

en: American mustard
nb: amerikansk sennep, amerikansk-inspirert sennep

en: English mustard
de: Englischer Senf
es: mostaza inglesa
fr: Moutarde anglaise
hr: engleski senf
it: senape inglese
nb: engelsk sennep, engelsk-inspirert sennep
nl: Engelse mosterd

en: mustard seed
bg: синапено семе, синапени семена, синапени зърна
ca: llavors de mostassa, grans de mostassa
cs: hořčičné semínko, hořčičné semeno, hořčičná semena
da: sennepsfrø
de: Senfsaaten, Senfkörner, Senfsaat, Senfsamen, Senfschrot, Senfkorn
el: σιναπόσπορος
es: grano de mostaza, semillas de mostaza, cascara de semillas de mostaza
et: sinepiseemned
fi: sinapinsiemen, sinapinsiemenet
fr: graine de moutarde, graines de moutarde, cosse de moutarde
hr: sjemenke gorušice, sjeme gorušice, ljuske gorušice
hu: káposztafélék, Mustármag
it: Semi di senape
ja: カラシナ, シロガラシ, マスタードシード
lv: sinepju sēklas
nb: sennepsfrø
nl: mosterdzaad, mosterdzaden
nn: sennepsfrø
pl: ziarno gorczycy, ziarna gorczycy, gorczyca, gorczycy, gorczycę, nasiona gorczycy, gorczycę
pt: Semente de mostarda
ro: boabe de muștar, boabe de mustar, semințe de muștar
ru: горчичное зерно
sl: gorčično seme, gorčična semena
sr: seme slačice
sv: senapsfrö, senapsfrön
tr: hardal tohumu

en: yellow mustard seed
de: Gelbsenfsaat, Senfsaat gelb, gelbes Senfkorn
es: semilla de mostaza amarilla, semillas de mostaza amarilla
fi: keltainen sinapinsiemen
fr: graines de moutarde jaunes
hr: zrno žute gorušice
it: chicchi di senape gialla
nl: geel mosterdzaad, gele mosterdzaden
pl: gorczyca biała, gorczycy białej, gorczyca żółta, gorczycy żółtej
sv: gult senapsfrö, gula senapsfrön

en: brown mustard
de: braunes Senf
it: senape bruna

en: brown mustard seed
de: Braunsenfsaat
fi: ruskea sinapinsiemen
fr: Graines de moutarde brune
hr: smeđe sjeme gorušice
it: semi di senape bruna
nl: bruin mosterdzaad
sv: brunt senapsfrö, bruna senapsfrön

en: black mustard seed
de: schwarze Senfsaaten
fr: Graines de moutarde noire
hr: sjeme crne gorušice
it: semi di senape nera
nl: zwart mosterdzaad
pl: gorczyca czarna

en: yellow and brown mustard seeds
de: gelbe und braune Senfkörner, gelbe und braune Senfsamen, gelbe und braune Senfsaat
fi: keltaiset ja ruskeat sinapinsiemenet
fr: graines de moutarde jaune et brune
hr: žute i smeđe sjemenke gorušice
it: semi di senape gialla e marrone
sv: gult och brunt senapsfrö, gula och bruna senapsfrön, senapsfrön (gula och bruna)

en: mustard powder, mustard flour
bg: синапено брашно
da: sennepspulver, sennepsmel
de: Senfpulver, Senfmehl
es: mostaza en polvo, harina de mostaza
et: sinepijahu
fi: sinappijauhe
fr: moutarde en poudre, poudre de moutarde, farine de moutarde
is: sinnepsduft
it: senape in polvere
ja: マスタードパウダー
lt: garstyčių milteliai
nb: sennepsmel
nl: mosterdpoeder, mosterdmeel
pl: mąka z gorczycy
ru: горчичный порошок
sv: senapspulver, senapsfröpulver

en: dijon mustard
bg: горчица по дижонски, дижонска горчица
cs: Dijonská hořčice
da: dijonsennep
de: Dijon-Senf
eo: Diĵona mustardo
es: Mostaza de Dijon
fa: خردل دیژون
fi: dijon-sinappi
fr: moutarde de dijon
he: חרדל דיז'ון
hr: senf Dijon
it: senape di Digione
ja: ディジョンマスタード
ko: 디종 머스터드
ku: Gormiza Dijonê
nb: Dijonsennep
nl: mosterd van Dijon, Dijon-mosterd, mosterd uit Dijon
pl: Musztarda Dijon
pt: Mostarda Dijon
ru: Дижонская горчица
sv: dijonsenap
th: มัสตาร์ดดีฌง
tr: Dijon hardalı
uk: Діжонська гірчиця
zh: 法式黃芥末醬

en: strong Dijon mustard
fr: moutarde forte de dijon
it: senape forte di Digione

en: strong mustard
fr: moutarde forte
hr: jaka gorušica
it: senape forte
nl: sterke mosterd

fr: moutarde à l'ancienne
bg: еднозърнеста горчица
nl: ambachtelijke mosterd
sv: gammaldags senap

en: mustard flavouring
hr: aroma gorušice
it: aroma di senape

en: pink peppercorn, pink berries, pink pepper, rose pepper
ar: حب فلفل زهري
az: çəhrayı istiot
ca: pebre fals
cs: pepř růžový
da: rosépeber
de: Rosa Pfeffer, Rosa Beeren, rosa Pfefferbeeren
es: pimienta rosa
fa: فلفل صورتی
fi: roseepippuri, rosépippuri, perunroseepippuri, ruusupippuri
fr: poivre rose, baies roses
hr: ružčasti papar, Schinus jagoda
ht: bè woz
it: pepe rosa
ja: ピンクペッパー
ko: 핑크페퍼
la: Granum piperis roseum
ml: പിങ്ക് പെപ്പർകോൺ
nl: roze bessen
pt: pimenta rosa
ru: розовый перец
sl: rožnati poper
sv: rosépeppar
uk: рожевий перець

en: star anise
af: Steranys
ar: ليسوم حقيقي, انيسون نجمي
az: Əsl badyan
be: Бадзян сапраўдны
bg: звездовиден анасон
bo: གོ་སྙོད་ཟུར་བརྒྱད།
ca: Anís estrellat
cs: Badyán, Badyáník pravý
da: Stjerneanis
de: Sternanis
es: Anis estrellado
et: Tähtaniis, harilik tähtaniisipuu
eu: Txinatar anis
fa: بادیان ختایی
fi: tähtianis, rusotähtianis
fr: anis étoilé, badiane, badiane chinoise, Étoile de badiane
gl: Anís estrelado
gu: બાદિયાન
hi: चक्रफूल
hr: zvjezdani anis
hu: Csillagánizs
id: Bunga Lawang
it: anice stellato
ja: トウシキミ
jv: Kembang lawang
ko: 팔각
la: Illicium verum
ml: തക്കോലം
ms: Bunga lawang
nb: Stjerneanis
nl: steranijs
oc: Badiana
or: ଅନାସି ଫୁଲ
pl: Cynamonowiec cejloński, Badian właściwy, anyż gwiaździsty, anyżu gwiaździstego, anyż gwiazdkowy
pt: Estrela-de-anis
ru: анис звёздчатый
sd: باديان خطائي
sk: Badián
sr: Звездасти анис
sv: Stjärnanis
th: โป๊ยกั้ก
tl: Sangke
tr: Yıldız anason
uk: Бодян справжній
vi: Đại hồi
wa: Anisse-sitoele
zh: 八角

en: summer savory, savory
bg: ронена чубрица
da: sar
de: Bohnenkraut
es: ajedrea
fr: sariette, sarriette
hr: ljetni ukusan
it: santoreggia
nl: bonenkruid
pl: cząber, cząbru
ro: cimbru
sv: kyndel

en: coriander leaf, coriander leaves, cilantro
da: korianderblad, korianderblade
de: Korianderblätter
eo: koriandrofolio
es: hoja de cilantro, hojas de cilantro
fi: korianterinlehdet, korianterinlehti
fr: feuille de coriandre, feuilles de coriandre, coriandre en feuille
hr: list korijandra
hu: korianderlevél
it: foglie di coriandolo
nb: korianderblad
nl: korianderblad, korianderblaadjes, koriander blaadjes
nn: korianderblad
pl: liście kolendry
sv: korianderblad